Missouri, session 2026, SB1744.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 389, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 389.1100, to read as
follows:
389.1100. 1. No railroad operating within this state
shall operate, or permit to be operated, any train exceeding
eight thousand five hundred feet in total length on any main
track or branch line.
2. The department of transportation shall have
authority to adopt rules and standards to implement and
enforce this section, including procedures for measurement,
exemptions for specific routes, and penalties for
violations. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently

SB 1744 2
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓